Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB126.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 135. Special Provisions Applicable to 2025-2026 School Year.--(a) Any university located in this Commonwealth which authorizes, facilitates, provides for or otherwise supports any event promoting antisemitism on the university campus may not receive any source of funding from the Commonwealth for the academic school year in which the antisemitic event under this section occurs.(b) A university which has received any source of funding prior to the date on which the university authorized, 1234567891011121314151617181920 facilitated, provided for or otherwise supported an event under subsection (a) shall refund the Commonwealth the amount of funding received from the Commonwealth for the academic school year in which the event under subsection (a) occurred.(c) Violations of this section shall be reported to the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education shall schedule a hearing within thirty (30) days to evaluate the alleged violations of this section. Pending a majority vote by the State Board of Education, the university shall be subject to the funding penalties outlined in this section.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Antisemitism." A certain perception of Jewish individuals, which may be expressed as hatred toward Jewish individuals, including rhetorical and physical manifestations of antisemitism that are directed toward Jewish or non-Jewish individuals or their property, Jewish community institutions and religious facilities. The term includes the following:(1) Calling for, aiding or justifying the killing or harming of Jewish individuals in the name of a radical ideology or an extremist view of religion.(2) Making mendacious, dehumanizing, demonizing or stereotypical allegations about Jewish individuals as such or the power of people of Jewish faith as a collective, including the myth about a world Jewish conspiracy or of Jewish individuals controlling the media, economy, government or other societal institutions.(3) Accusing Jewish individuals as a people of being responsible for real or imagined wrongdoing committed by a 20250SB0126PN0075 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 single Jewish individual or group or for acts committed by non-Jewish individuals.(4) Denying the fact, scope, mechanisms or intentionality of the genocide of the Jewish people at the hands of National Socialist Germany, supporters and accomplices during World War II.(5) Accusing people of Jewish faith, or Israel as a state, of inventing or exaggerating the Holocaust.(6) Accusing Jewish citizens of being more loyal to Israel, or to the alleged priorities of Jewish individuals worldwide, than to the interests of the individuals' nation.(7) Denying the Jewish people the right to self-determination, including by claiming the existence of a state of Israel is a racist endeavor.(8) Applying a double standard by requiring a behavior not expected or demanded of any other democratic nation.(9) Using the symbols and images associated with classic antisemitism, including claims of Jewish individuals killing Jesus or blood libel to characterize Israel or Israelis.(10) Drawing comparisons of contemporary Israeli policy to that of the Nazis.(11) Calling for the extermination of a Jewish state.(12) Holding people of Jewish faith collectively responsible for actions of the state of Israel."Funding." The term shall include:(1) Budget allocation.(2) Commonwealth grants received by the university."University." As defined in 24 Pa.C.S. § 6503.1(f) (relating to change of designation to university).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0126PN0075 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930